Idaho statutes. Title 60 PUBLIC PRINTING AND OFFICIAL NOTICES
Chapter 1
CONTRACTS FOR PRINTING — PUBLICATION OF NOTICES

Sec.

§ 60-101. Contracts for state printing — Execution within state — Exception.

All printing, binding (excluding binding for state supported libraries), engraving and stationery work executed for or on behalf of the state, and for which the state contracts, or becomes in any way responsible, shall be executed within the state of Idaho, except as provided in section 60-103, Idaho Code. Provided, however, that this section shall not apply to any compilation, publication or codification of the laws of the state of Idaho.

§ 60-102. Contracts for county printing — Execution within county or state.

All county printing, binding and stationery work, executed for or on behalf of the several counties throughout the state, for which the said counties contract, or become in any way responsible, shall be executed within the county for which said work is done, when there are practicable facilities within the said county for executing the same, but when it shall become necessary, from want of proper facilities, to execute the work without the said county, then the same shall be executed at some place within the state of Idaho, except as provided in the following section.

§ 60-103. Exception in case of excessive charge — Exceptions for lack of production facilities on bids on state or county work.

Whenever it shall be established that any charge for printing, engraving, binding (excluding binding for state supported libraries) or stationery work is in excess of the charge usually made to private individuals for the same kind and quality of work, then the state or county officer or officers having such work in charge shall have power to have such work done outside of said county or state, but nothing in this chapter shall be construed to oblige any of said officers to accept any unsatisfactory work.

Any work referred to in section 60-101 or 60-102, Idaho Code, and which is to be executed for or on behalf of the state or a county may be executed outside of this state in any case (1) where the execution of such work shall require the use of a technique or process which cannot be performed through the use of physical production facilities located within this state and the use of such technique or process is essential to a necessary function to be served by the printing, binding, engraving or stationery work required; (2) where, after a solicitation has been made or notice thereof has been given as required by section 67-9208, Idaho Code, no bid or proposal is made thereon by any person, firm or corporation proposing to execute such work within this state; or (3) where, after a solicitation has been made or notice thereof given as required by section 67-9208, Idaho Code, the lowest bid from a person, firm or corporation proposing to execute such work within this state is more than ten percent (10%) above the lowest bid from a person, firm or corporation proposing to execute such work outside this state.

§ 60-104. Penalty for violation of chapter.

Any state or county officer either as an official, member of a board, or purchasing agent, who violates any of the above provisions, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in a sum not less than $100.00 nor more than $500.00 for each offense, and shall be liable upon his official bond for the amount of such contract entered into; provided, however, that this section shall not apply and the penalties herein provided for shall not be imposed against any such officer in any case where the person, firm or corporation with whom any such officer contracts or places an order for the performance of any work, as required by section 60-101[, Idaho Code,] or section 60-102[, Idaho Code,] shall have represented in writing to such officer that such work would be executed within a specified county or within this state and such person, firm or corporation shall then permit or cause such work, or any part thereof, to be executed outside of such county or outside of this state contrary to such representation; but any such failure to comply with such representation on the part of any such person, firm or corporation shall render him or it ineligible to bid on or accept, directly or indirectly, any printing, binding, engraving or stationery work for any county or for this state for a period of one (1) year from the date of the contract or order with respect to which such failure occurred.

§ 60-105. Rates for official notices.

On and after October 1, 2007, the rate to be charged for all official notices required by law to be published in any newspaper in this state, by any state, county, municipal official or other person, shall be as follows: seven and one-half cents (7.5¢) for each pica in a column line for the first insertion and six and one-half cents (6.5¢) for each pica in a column line for each subsequent insertion. For table and figure matter, the rate shall be eight and one-half cents (8.5¢) for each pica in a column line for the first insertion, and six and one-half cents (6.5¢) for each pica in a column line for each subsequent insertion. In the event that a column line ends in a one-half (1/2) pica measurement, the rate for such one-half (1/2) pica shall be one-half (1/2) the rate established for a full pica for the type of matter set forth herein. For purposes of this section, the type used shall not be smaller than seven (7) point nor greater than eight (8) point.

On and after October 1, 2008, the rate to be charged for all official notices required by law to be published in any newspaper in this state, by any state, county, municipal official or other person, shall be as follows: eight cents (8¢) for each pica in a column line for the first insertion and seven cents (7¢) for each pica in a column line for each subsequent insertion. For table and figure matter, the rate shall be nine cents (9¢) for each pica in a column line for the first insertion, and seven cents (7¢) for each pica in a column line for each subsequent insertion. In the event that a column line ends in a one-half (1/2) pica measurement, the rate for such one-half (1/2) pica shall be one-half (1/2) the rate established for a full pica for the type of matter set forth herein. For purposes of this section, the type used shall not be smaller than seven (7) point nor greater than eight (8) point.

§ 60-106. Qualifications of newspapers printing legal notices.

No newspaper shall qualify under this section unless the same shall hold a valid second class mailing permit from the United States Post Office. Any violations of the previous requirements of this section concerning printing of newspapers other than in the governmental entity in which a notice or advertisement is required to be printed are hereby excused and any advertisement published in any such newspapers is hereby validated.

§ 60-106A. Electronic publication of legal notices by newspapers.

In addition to the newspaper publication required by section 60-106, Idaho Code, legal notices, advertisements or publications of any kind required or provided by the laws of the state of Idaho to be published in a newspaper may also be electronically published by any newspaper. An electronically published legal notice, advertisement or publication shall have the same legal effect as a legal notice, advertisement or publication that is published in a newspaper.

The following definitions apply to this section:

“Electronically published” means the printing and disseminating of legal notices, advertisements or publications through the use of messaging.

“Messaging” means the use of interconnected electronic networks that automatically transmit data from one (1) computer to another.

The following provisions apply to this section:

Electronic publication may be in addition to the required printed publication in a newspaper; and

Electronic publication may be made by newspapers having electronic publication capability. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a newspaper to develop and maintain an electronic publication capability; and

Newspapers may not charge an additional rate for electronic publication. Rates for such electronic publication shall be included in the rates for official notices as provided for in section 60-105, Idaho Code; and

Any party placing a legally required public notice in electronic form should, to the greatest extent practicable, provide in such notices the messaging address of the newspaper and, if applicable, that of the person or governmental agency requiring such notice to be published.

§ 60-107. “Daily newspaper” defined.

A newspaper published within the state of Idaho for five (5) consecutive days a week, excepting legal holidays, is hereby declared to be a daily newspaper within the meaning of section 60-106[, Idaho Code].

§ 60-108. Designation of day for publication of weekly notices.

A daily newspaper is [as] defined in section 60-107[, Idaho Code,] and published within the state of Idaho, may designate a particular day of the week on which legal notices required by law or by order of any court of competent jurisdiction within the state to be published weekly, will be published, and all notices published in the issue of said newspaper under said date, shall be deemed to have been published once a week in a weekly newspaper.

Provided, however, that the publisher of such newspaper shall, at the head of the editorial column of said paper and in each issue thereof, announce the day of the week on which such legal notices required by law or by order of any court of competent jurisdiction to be published weekly, will be published.

Provided, further, that when said day of the week falls on a legal holiday on which the said newspaper does not publish a regular issue, all such legal notices intended for publication on that day may be published on the next following or preceding business day, and such notice so published shall be deemed to have been published once per week.

§ 60-109. Publication of notices — Number of publications required.

Whenever any law of this state requires publication of any notice or proceeding, said requirement shall be satisfied by publishing the same once each calendar week on the same day of each week for the number of times equal to the number of weeks mentioned in the requirement in any regular issue of a newspaper published on one or more days of each week; or when a specified number of days is required, a ten (10) days’ notice shall be satisfied by two (2) such weekly publications, a twenty (20) days’ notice by three (3) such publications, and a thirty (30) days’ notice by five (5) such publications.

§ 60-109A. Publication by first class mail.

Any notice required by law to be published by any regional board, commission, department or authority created by or pursuant to statute; any county, city, school district, special district, any joint district, or other political subdivision of the state of Idaho may be published by mailing such notice by first class mail, postage prepaid, to the residents of such jurisdiction; provided, however, that publication by mail as provided for herein, shall constitute legal notice only if the cost of mailing, including preparation, materials and postage, is less than the cost of other publication required by law. Proof of such mailing shall be by sworn affidavit of the duly constituted officers of the body publishing the notice.

§ 60-110. Publication of legal notices by radio or television — Restrictions.

Any official of the state of Idaho or any of its political subdivisions who is required by law to publish any notice required by law may supplement publication thereof by radio or television broadcast or both when, in his judgment, the public interest will be served thereby: Provided, that the time, place and nature of such notice only be read or shown with no reference to any person by name then a candidate for political office, and that such broadcasts shall be made only by duly employed personnel of the station from which such broadcasts emanate, and that notices by political subdivisions may be made only by stations situated within the political subdivision of origin of the legal notice, but if no radio or television broadcasting station be situated in the political subdivision of origin, said notice may be broadcast over any radio or television station having general coverage therein.

§ 60-111. Broadcaster to retain copy or transcription.

Each radio or television station broadcasting any legal notice or notice of event shall for a period of six (6) months subsequent to such broadcast retain at its office a copy or transcription of the text of the notice as actually broadcast which shall be available for public inspection.

§ 60-112. Proof of publication by radio and television.

Proof of publication of legal notice or notice of event by radio or television broadcast shall be by affidavit of the manager, an assistant manager or a program director of the station broadcasting the same, annexed to a copy or transcription of the text of the notice as actually broadcast, specifying the dates on which, and time of day, the publication was made.

§ 60-113. Notices affecting interests in real property.

Any published notice that affects or may affect any interest in real property must, in addition to the legal description, contain either (a) a street address or other information which would be of assistance to the public in ascertaining the location of the property; or (b) the name and telephone number of a person, firm or business office from whom information concerning the location of the property may be obtained; provided, however, that the adequacy of the information not essential to a proper legal description shall not give rise to a jurisdictional defect in a proceeding or action contemplated by the published notice.